Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-307] Simultaneous proceedings. If
a proceeding for enforcement under this part is commenced in a court of this
State and the court determines that a proceeding to modify the determination is
pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to modify the
determination under part II, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate
with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement continues unless the
enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or
dismisses the proceeding. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next